Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 1 Public Utilities Commission
39-1-27.3.
Electric distribution companies required to provide retail access, standard offer and last-resort service.

To promote economic development and the creation and preservation of employment opportunities within the state, each electric distribution company, except Pascoag Utility District, a quasi-municipal corporation, district, and subdivision of the state (“electric distribution company”), shall offer retail access from nonregulated power producers to all customers.

Through year 2009, and effective July 1, 2007, through year 2020, each electric distribution company shall arrange for a standard power-supply offer (“standard offer”) to customers that have not elected to enter into power-supply arrangements with other nonregulated power suppliers. The rates that are charged by the electric distribution company to customers for standard-offer service shall be approved by the commission and shall be designed to recover the electric distribution company’s costs and no more than the electric distribution company’s costs; provided, that the commission may establish and/or implement a rate that averages the costs over periods of time. The electric distribution company shall not be entitled to recover any profit margin on the sale of standard-offer power, except with approval of the commission as may be necessary to implement, fairly and effectively, system reliability and least-cost procurement. The electric distribution company will be entitled to recover its costs incurred from providing the standard offer arising out of: (1) Wholesale standard-offer supply agreements with power suppliers in effect prior to January 1, 2002; (2) Power-supply arrangements that are approved by the commission after January 1, 2002; (3) Power-supply arrangements made pursuant to §§

39-1-27.3.1

and

39-1-27.8

; and (4) Any other power-supply-related arrangements prudently made after January 1, 2002, to provide standard-offer supply or to mitigate standard-offer supply costs, including costs for system reliability, procurement, and least-cost procurement, as provided for in §

39-1-27.7

. Subject to commission approval, the electric distribution company may enter into financial contracts designed to hedge fuel-related or other variable costs associated with power-supply arrangements and the costs of any such financial contracts shall be recoverable in standard-offer rates. The electric distribution company’s standard-offer revenues and its standard-offer costs shall be accounted for and reconciled with interest at least annually. Except as otherwise may be directed by the commission in order to accomplish purposes established by law, any over recoveries shall be refunded to customers in a manner directed by the commission, and any under recoveries shall be recovered by the electric distribution company through a uniform adjustment factor approved by the commission. The commission shall have the discretion to apply such adjustment factor in any given instance to all customers or to such specific class of customers that the commission deems equitable under the circumstances provided that the distribution company recovers any under recovery in its entirety. Once a customer has elected to enter into a power-supply arrangement with a nonregulated power producer, the electric distribution company shall not be required to arrange for the standard offer to such customer except as provided in §

39-1-27.3.1

. No customer who initially elects the standard offer and then chooses an alternative supplier shall be required to pay any withdrawal fee or penalty to the provider of the standard offer unless such a penalty or withdrawal fee was agreed to as part of a contract; however, no residential customer shall be required to pay a penalty or withdrawal fee for choosing an alternative supplier. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to restrict the right of any nonregulated power producer to offer to sell power to customers at a price comparable to that of the standard offer specified pursuant to this subsection. The electric distribution company may not terminate an existing standard-offer wholesale supply agreement without the written consent of the division.

In recognition that electricity is an essential service, each electric distribution company shall arrange for a last-resort power supply for customers who have left the standard offer for any reason and are not otherwise receiving electric service from nonregulated power producers. The electric distribution company shall procure last-resort service supply from wholesale power suppliers. Prior to acquiring last-resort supply, the electric distribution company will file with the commission a supply acquisition plan or plans that include the acquisition procedure, the pricing options being sought, and a proposed term of service for which last-resort service will be acquired. The term of service may be short- or long-term and acquisitions may occur from time to time and for more than one supplier for segments of last-resort service load over different terms, if appropriate. All the components of the acquisition plans, however, shall be subject to commission review and approval. Once an acquisition plan is approved by the commission, the electric distribution company shall be authorized to acquire last-resort service supply consistent with the approved acquisition plan and recover its costs incurred from providing last-resort service pursuant to the approved acquisition plan. The commission may periodically review the acquisition plan to determine whether it should be prospectively modified due to changed market conditions. The commission shall have the authority and discretion to approve special tariff conditions and rates proposed by the electric distribution company that the commission finds are in the public interest, including without limitation: (1) Short- or long-term optional service at different rates; (2) Term commitments or notice provisions before individual customers leave last-resort service; (3) Last-resort service rates for residential or any other special class of customers that are different than the rates for other last-resort customers; and/or (4) Last-resort service rates that are designed to encourage any class of customers to return to the market. The electric distribution company’s last-resort service revenues and its last-resort service costs shall be accounted for and reconciled with interest at least annually. Any over recoveries shall be refunded and any under recoveries shall be recovered by the electric distribution company through a uniform adjustment factor approved by the commission. The commission shall have the discretion to apply such adjustment factor in any given instance to all customers or to such specific class of customers that the commission deems equitable under the circumstances provided that the distribution company recovers any under recovery in its entirety. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an electric distribution company from terminating service provided hereunder in accordance with commission rules and regulations in the event of nonpayment of this service. The commission may promulgate regulations to implement this section including the terms and conditions upon which last-resort service is offered and provided to customers.

If a customer being served by a nonregulated power producer pays any taxes assessed for electric service to the electric distribution company and the electric distribution company forwards such tax payment for the power portion of the bill to a nonregulated power producer for payment by the nonregulated power producer to the state, neither the customer nor the electric distribution company shall be liable for such taxes forwarded if the nonregulated power producer fails to remit such taxes to the state for any reason.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 103; P.L. 1997, ch. 357, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 236, § 5; P.L. 2006, ch. 237, § 5; P.L. 2015, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 90, § 1.

39-1-27.3.1.
Option to return to standard offer.

The commission may, notwithstanding the provisions of §

39-1-27.3

, allow customers no longer eligible for standard-offer service to return to standard-offer service, subject to the process set forth in this section. The process shall be as follows: The commission shall hold hearings to determine whether there is a sufficient presence of nonregulated power producers offering reasonably priced power-supply service to customers in Rhode Island. If the commission determines that these market conditions are not present, the commission shall direct the electric distribution company to prepare and file a plan that creates an option for customers to return to the standard offer, including terms and conditions for customers returning and the manner in which the power supply will be procured. This plan may include term commitments or notice provisions before nonresidential customers are permitted to leave standard-offer service once they return. The commission shall conduct a hearing to review the electric distribution company’s plan and issue an order approving the plan, including any modifications the commission deems appropriate.

Once the plan is approved by the commission, the electric distribution company and the division shall jointly prepare a request for power-supply proposals (“RFP”) consistent with the commission’s order, develop reasonable bidder qualifications, issue the RFP, review the bids, and jointly select a winning bidder or bidders to supply power. If the electric distribution company and the division mutually agree that the bids are unreasonably high, they shall have the discretion to reject all bids and re-issue an RFP at a later date that they deem appropriate. If the electric distribution company and the division cannot agree on any matter, the dispute shall be submitted to the commission for resolution. Once the winning bidder or bidders are selected, a supply contract or contracts on terms reasonably acceptable to the distribution company and the division will be executed by the electric distribution company and no further regulatory approval shall be required. However, the results of the bidding process shall be filed with the commission.

All of the costs associated with the new supply contract(s) will be recovered through standard-offer rates and the electric distribution company’s fully reconciling adjustment provision.

The standard-offer rates for the residential customers returning to the standard offer shall be the same as the standard-offer rate paid by all other standard-offer customers. The standard-offer rates for the nonresidential customers returning to the standard offer shall be determined by the commission after the commission reviews the costs of the power supply resulting from the bid process. The rate for nonresidential customers returning to the standard offer may differ from those of other customers, if the commission deems the rate differential to be appropriate.

Any customer returning to the standard offer may not enter into any agreement to use standard-offer service to arbitrage the market with any supplier while the customer is on the standard offer and it shall be unlawful for any nonregulated power producer to enter into such an agreement.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to create a legally enforceable entitlement for any supplier to require the electric distribution company to select any particular bid and/or sign a contract with the supplier.

The requirements set forth in this section shall not apply to Pascoag Fire District or Block Island Power Company.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 144, § 2.

39-1-27.4.
Transition charges authorized.

An electric distribution company that purchases power at wholesale from a wholesale power supplier under an all-requirements contract shall be authorized to execute an agreement terminating, in whole or in part, such all-requirements contracts on terms that require payment of a contract termination fee complying with the requirements in subsection (b) and notwithstanding any other provisions of this title, shall be allowed to recover the payment through a nonbypassable transition charge paid by all customers of the electric distribution company. Any nonregulated power producer may pay all or a part of its customers’ transition charges.

The contract termination fee paid by the electric distribution company to its wholesale power supplier shall include the electric distribution company’s share of its wholesale supplier’s costs associated with the following:

Regulatory assets related to the generation business that include costs for which recovery has been deferred to the future in accordance with prior rate cases or settlements approved by regulators, or consistent with regulatory precedent; regulatory assets of affiliated fuel suppliers; and transition obligations for post-retirement healthcare costs of the wholesale supplier; and

Nuclear obligations including decommissioning costs and nuclear costs independent of operation. Transition costs attributable to nuclear decommissioning must be deposited in unit-specific decommissioning trust funds or returned to customers if not needed. Nuclear costs independent of operation shall mean estimated nuclear operation and maintenance expenses that would be incurred assuming the nuclear units were to permanently cease operating on December 31, 1997; and

Above-market payments to power suppliers for purchased power contracts of the wholesale power supplier in place as of December 31, 1995, together with reasonable payments of the wholesale power supplier to buy out of these contracts or to reduce payments pursuant to them; and

The net unrecovered commitments and capital costs of all generating plants owned directly or indirectly by the electric distribution company and its wholesale power supplier as of December 31, 1995, whether or not the generating plants are operating, including natural gas conversion costs and above-market pipeline demand charges. Except as provided above, no operation or maintenance expenses associated with existing fossil-fired or hydroelectric generating facilities may be included in contract termination fees to be recovered by electric distribution companies from customers through transition charges.

Because of the uncertainty associated with the timing and amounts to be paid pursuant to subsections (b)(2) (with the exception of nuclear costs independent of operation) and (b)(3), the termination fee to the wholesale supplier and the related transition charge to the electric distribution company’s customers shall continue until these liabilities have been satisfied with an annual reconciliation of estimated to actual expenses. Because the items specified in subsections (b)(1) and (b)(4) can be determined with certainty or reasonably estimated and the nuclear costs independent of operation can be reasonably estimated, no annual reconciliation is necessary for these items. However, to moderate the rate impact of these items, recovery through the transition charge will be spread over the period from July 1, 1997, through December 31, 2009, with a return on the unamortized balance as specified in subsection (d); effective January 1, 2010, there shall be no allowance for these items in the transition charges billed by electric distribution companies.

In recognition of the potential for a positive residual value of existing generating facilities at the conclusion of the amortization period in the year 2010, the return on equity allowed on the unamortized balance of subsections (b)(1) and (b)(4) paid to the wholesale supplier and recoverable from customers of the electric distribution company shall be limited to one percentage point plus the average rate of return on BBB-rated long-term utility bonds issued during the six-month (6) period July through December, 1996.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, other than subsection (g), for the period July 1, 1997, to December 31, 2000, the nonbypassable transition charge implemented by the electric distribution company shall recover an amount equal to two and eight-tenths of a cent (2.8¢) per kilowatt-hour transmitted or distributed. After the year 2000, the transition charge recoverable from customers shall be established by the commission in an amount sufficient to recover the costs authorized in this section with an adjustment for any over or under recoveries of the contract termination fees occurring during the period July 1, 1997, to December 31, 2000. The adjustment under this subsection shall be made in a manner the commission determines appropriate.

Any wholesale power supplier receiving contract termination fees with respect to power-purchase contracts pursuant to subsection (b)(3) shall offer to sell, buy down, or assign to others, through either public bid or private negotiation, at least the portion of the contracts attributable to its affiliated electric distribution company. To the extent that bids received or terms negotiated would, on an expected value basis, lower the transition charges paid by ultimate customers in Rhode Island, the wholesaler power supplier shall use all reasonable means to consummate the sale, buydown, or assignment and upon completion shall promptly file appropriate adjustments to the contract termination fees in place at that time. To provide an incentive for wholesale power suppliers to obtain the best possible terms for any sale, buydown, or assignment, they shall be allowed to retain ten percent (10%) of the savings expected to be realized by customers as a result of the sale, buydown, or assignment. The amount of any incentive payment shall be fixed at the time of the sale, buydown, or assignment based on estimated data and recovered in equal payments over the remaining term of the related power-purchase contract with appropriate adjustments for the time value of money.

Every wholesale power supplier receiving contract termination fees pursuant to this section shall, subject to receipt of all necessary regulatory approvals, subject its electric-generating facilities, other than nuclear units or entitlements, as of January 1, 1996, to a form of market valuation through lease, sale, spin-off, or other method. The wholesale power supplier shall select the valuation methodology utilized which may be for all the generating facilities as a group, groups of generating facilities, or individual generating facilities. The wholesale power supplier shall meet its obligations under this section by leasing, selling, spinning off, or otherwise disposing of at least a fifteen percent (15%) interest in its electrical-generating facilities, other than nuclear units or entitlements; provided, however, if, pursuant to a requirement in connection with electric industry restructuring in another state prior to completion of the valuation pursuant to this subsection, a wholesale power supplier subject to this subsection is required to sell, spin-off, or otherwise dispose of more than a fifteen percent (15%) ownership interest in its electric-generating facilities, other than nuclear units or entitlements, then the same requirement, including related timing requirements, shall apply in the state and the market valuation resulting from fulfilling that requirement shall be used in determining the adjustment to the contract termination fee required by this subsection. Once the wholesale power supplier determines the percentage interest in its electrical-generating facilities that it will lease, sell, spin-off, or otherwise submit to market valuation to meet its obligation under this subsection, the company shall develop an implementation methodology to accomplish the lease, sale, spin-off, or other disposition of interest that is reasonably likely to approximate the market value of the generation assets. The implementation methodology shall be filed with the commission on or before July 1, 1997, for the commission to review and approve or reject no later than ninety (90) days after submittal. The commission shall approve the implementation methodology unless the commission finds, after public hearing, the methodology is not reasonably likely to approximate the market value of the company’s generating assets, taking into consideration the restrictions included in mortgage indentures and the need to satisfy the requirements of regulatory authorities outside the state. Promptly after commission approval of the implementation methodology, companies subject to this section must submit, for regulatory review, applications for the approvals necessary to commence such valuation. In addition, companies subject to this section shall also provide the commission with quarterly status reports on the progress of proceedings before other regulatory agencies associated with the implementation of this section. The valuation required by this section shall be completed within six (6) months after: (1) Retail access is available to forty percent (40%) or more of the kilowatt-hour sales in New England or (2) The receipt of all necessary regulatory approval for the valuation, whichever occurs later; provided, however, the commission may extend the deadline for completing the valuation by no more than six (6) months if it determines that an extension is in the public interest. Upon completion of the valuation, the wholesale power supplier, together with its affiliated electric distribution company shall file to adjust the contract termination fees in place at the time the valuation is complete as necessary to reflect the electric distribution company’s share of the market valuation in the transition charge paid by ultimate customers in Rhode Island. Any adjustment shall be net of the estimated revenue lost by the wholesale power supplier as a result of retail access during the period prior to completion of such valuation, the electric distribution company’s share of prudently incurred capital investments made after December 31, 1995, which were reasonably necessary to (i) Enable the electrical-generating facilities to operate safely and in compliance with applicable laws and regulations, (ii) Improve environmental performance or to increase fuel diversity or flexibility, with regulatory authorization, reasonable transaction costs, (including the cost of refinancing), and revenue lost as a result of the reduced return on equity specified in subsection (d). For purposes of this section, the unreduced return on equity that will be used prospectively and to value the revenue lost prior to the adjustment shall be the return on equity allowed to the wholesale power supplier’s affiliated electric distribution company as of December 31, 1995, and shall be included in the wholesale power supplier’s overall capital structure following the valuation. Any adjustment to the contract termination fee pursuant to this subsection shall be reflected in the termination fee otherwise calculated in accordance with subsection (b) as a uniform adjustment spread equally over the period beginning with the date the adjustment is made and ending December 31, 2009.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1.

39-1-27.5.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 10, effective July 3, 2006.

39-1-27.6.
Standards of conduct.

An electric distribution company must conduct its business to conform with the standards of conduct specified in subsections (b) through (e).

Except as provided in subsection (b)(2) and as authorized by the commission pursuant to §

39-1-27(g)

, the employees of the electric distribution company engaged in distribution-system operations must function independently of its employees, or the employees of any of its affiliates, who are engaged in the business of a nonregulated power producer.

Notwithstanding any other provisions in this section, in emergency circumstances affecting system reliability, electric distribution companies may take whatever steps are necessary to keep the system in operation. Electric distribution companies must report to the commission each emergency that resulted in any deviation from the standards of conduct, within twenty-four (24) hours of such deviation.

Any employee of any affiliate of an electric distribution company who is engaged in the business of a nonregulated power producer is prohibited from: conducting distribution-system operations or reliability functions; and having access to the system control center or similar facilities used for distribution operations or reliability functions that differs in any way from the access available to other nonregulated power producers.

Employees engaged in either an affiliated nonregulated power producer function or an electric distribution function are not precluded from transferring between such functions as long as such transfer is not used as a means to circumvent the standards of conduct of this section. Notices of any employee transfer to or from electric distribution company operation or reliability functions must be reported to the commission. The information to be reported must include: the name of the transferring employee; the respective titles held while performing each function (i.e., on behalf of the electric distribution company and the nonregulated power producer); and the effective date of the transfer.

Any employee of any affiliate of an electric distribution company who is engaged in the nonregulated power producer function must not have preferential access to any information about the electric distribution company’s distribution system that is not available to all nonregulated power producers.

An electric distribution company is responsible for ensuring that any employee of the electric distribution company may not disclose to employees of any affiliate engaged in a nonregulated power producer function any information concerning the distribution system of the electric distribution company or the distribution system of another (including information received from nonaffiliates or information about distribution-system operations, capability, price, curtailments, auxiliary services, and the like) through nonpublic communications that is not at the same time available to all nonregulated power producers without restriction. If an employee of the electric distribution company engaged in distribution-system operations or reliability functions discloses information in a manner contrary to the requirements of the standards of conduct, the electric distribution company must immediately report that information to the commission. An electric distribution company may not share any market information acquired from nonaffiliated, nonregulated power producers or developed in the course of responding to requests for distribution service with any employee of an affiliate engaged in a nonregulated power producer function.

All employees of the electric distribution company must apply all tariff provisions in a fair and impartial manner that treats all customers (including those of an affiliated nonregulated power producer) in a nondiscriminatory manner. The electric distribution company may not offer a discount on purchases of distribution service where this discount is conditioned upon customers purchasing power from a nonregulated power producer that is affiliated with the electric distribution company, nor shall an electric distribution company give preferences of any type in the provision of distribution service for customers purchasing power supply from a nonregulated power producer that is affiliated with the electric distribution company.

An electric distribution company must maintain its books of accounts and records separately from those of its affiliates and these must be available for commission inspection.

The electric distribution company must maintain in a public place, and file with the commission, current written procedures implementing the standards of conduct in such detail as will enable customers and the commission to determine that the electric distribution company is in compliance with the requirements of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 144, § 1.